Hawaii statutes.
[§225P-3] Interagency climate
adaptation committee; general functions, duties, and powers. (a) There is
established an interagency climate adaptation committee that shall be placed
within the department of land and natural resources for administrative purposes
only.

(b) Coordination of the committee shall be
headed jointly by the chairperson of the board of land and natural resources,
or the chairperson's designee, and the director of the office of planning, or
the director's designee. Among the various potential impacts of climate
change, the committee shall, as a first step, focus on and develop sea level
rise vulnerability and adaptation reports that shall include:

(1) Identification
of the major areas of sea level rise impacts affecting the State and counties
through 2050;

(2) Identification of expected impacts of sea level
rise based on the latest scientific research for each area through 2050;

(3) Identification of the economic ramifications of
sea level rise;

(4) Identification of applicable federal laws,
policies, or programs that impact affected areas; and

(5) Recommendations for planning, management, and
adaptation for hazards associated with increasing sea level rise.

The report shall be made publicly available no later
than December 31, 2017.

[(c)] The committee shall include the
following members:

(1) The chairs of the standing committees of the
legislature with subject matter jurisdiction encompassing environmental
protection and land use;

(2) The chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources or the chairperson's designee, who shall be the co-chair of the
committee;

(3) The director of the office of planning or the
director's designee, who shall be the co-chair of the committee;

(4) The director of business, economic development,
and tourism or the director's designee;

(5) The chairperson of the board of directors of the
Hawaii tourism authority or the chairperson's designee;

(6) The chairperson of the board of agriculture or
the chairperson's designee;

(7) The chief executive officer of the office of
Hawaiian affairs or the officer's designee;

(8) The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission
or the chairperson's designee;

(9) The director of transportation or the director's
designee;

(10) The director of health or the director's
designee;

(11) The adjutant general or the adjutant general's
designee;

(12) The chairperson of the board of education or the
chairperson's designee;

(13) The directors of each of the county planning
departments, or the directors' designees; and

(14) The manager of the coastal zone management
program.

[(d)] In addition to the members listed in
subsection (c), the chairs of the committee may request the participation or
input of members of the public; experts in the field; and county, state, or
federal officials necessary for the formulation of the report.

[(e)] In developing the report, the committee
shall:

(1) Solicit public views and concerns; and

(2) Coordinate with the various county, state, and
federal agencies involved in ongoing climate change adaptation planning
initiatives.

[(f)] The committee shall reevaluate and
update the sea level rise vulnerability and adaptation report every five years.

[(g)] The members of the committee shall serve
without pay but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses,
including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties. [L 2014, c
83, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next